Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6044.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 20. (1) All public highways for which the right of way has at any time been dedicated, given, or purchased, shall be and remain a highway of the width so dedicated, given, or purchased, and no encroachments by fences, buildings, or otherwise which may have been made since the purchase, dedication, or gift nor any encroachments which were within the limits of such right of way at the time of such purchase, dedication, or gift, and no encroachments which may hereafter be made, shall give the party or parties, firm, or corporation so encroaching, any title or right to the land so encroached upon. (2) The failure of a board of county road commissioners to order the removal of any encroachment or obstruction within a public highway shall not be used as evidence of the intention of the board to abandon the public highway by operation of common law or any other legal theory.